Utah statutes.
76-10-1907.   Separate offenses.
(1)  Under this part each individual currency transaction exceeding $10,000
and made in violation of Subsection 76-10-1906(1) or each financial
transaction in violation of Section 76-10-1903 or 76-10-1904 involving the
movement of funds in excess of $10,000 is a separate punishable offense.
(2)  Under this part each failure to file a report as required under
Subsection 76-10-1906 (1) is a separate punishable offense.
